District of Columbia statutes.
11-904

Judges; service; compensation.

(a)

The chief judge and the judges of the Superior Court shall serve as provided in Chapter 15 of this title.

(b)

Judges of the Superior Court shall be compensated at the rate prescribed by law for judges of United States district courts. The chief judge, while serving in that position, shall receive an additional $500 per annum.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 482, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
Oct. 28, 1986, 100 Stat. 3228, Pub. L. 99-573, § 16(b)
June 13, 1994, Pub. L. 103-266, § 1(b)(9), 108 Stat. 713

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-207.18.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 11-904.
1973 Ed., § 11-904.